Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2845.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Arizona state parks board; Del Rio Springs; state park; exemption A. The sum of $750,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona state parks board for development and necessary infrastructure at Del Rio Springs for a state park. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.